Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.665

Advertising—False—Credit terms.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to publish, directly or indirectly, or circulate any fraudulent, false, or misleading statements within the state of Washington as to the skill or method of practice of any person or operator; or in any way to advertise in print any matter with a view of deceiving the public, or in any way that will tend to deceive or defraud the public; or to claim superiority over neighboring dental practitioners; or to publish reports of cases or certificates of same in any public advertising media; or to advertise as using any anesthetic, drug, formula, medicine, which is either falsely advertised or misnamed; or to employ "capper" or "steerers" to obtain patronage; and any person committing any offense against any of the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be subjected to such penalties as are provided in this chapter: PROVIDED, That any person licensed under this chapter may announce credit, terms of credit or installment payments that may be made at periodical intervals to apply on account of any dental service rendered. The commission may adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out the intent of this section.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 223; 1986 c 259 s 36; 1935 c 112 s 20; RRS s 10031-20. Formerly RCW 18.32.290.]

NOTES:

Savings—1986 c 259 ss 36, 37, 41, 43: "The repeal of RCW 18.32.090 and 18.32.550 and the amendment of RCW 18.32.290, 18.32.360, and 18.32.530 by this act shall not be construed as affecting any rights and duties which matured, penalties which were incurred, and proceedings which were begun before June 11, 1986." [ 1986 c 259 s 44.]

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.

False advertising: RCW 9.04.010.